Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2540.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.73 RCW to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an emergency medical technician shall become recertified every three years.(2) An emergency medical technician who has been certified in Washington for at least 10 years shall become recertified every six years.--- END ---